Utah statutes.
75-5b-201.   Exclusive basis -- Significant connection.

(1)  This part provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a court of this state to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult.

(2)  In determining under Section 75-5b-203 and Subsection 75-5b-301(5) whether a respondent has a significant connection with a particular state, the court shall consider:

(a)  the location of the respondent's family and other persons required to be notified of the guardianship or protective proceeding;

(b)  the length of time the respondent at any time was physically present in the state and the duration of any absence;

(c)  the location of the respondent's property; and

(d)  the extent to which the respondent has ties to the state such as voting registration, state or local tax return filing, vehicle registration, driver license, social relationship, and receipt of services.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2008 General Session

